Maine, session 132, LD1795.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §508, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2007, c. 627, §12, is repealed
and the following enacted in its place:
1. Imposition. A municipality may impose an annual service charge on the owner of
property that is totally exempt from property taxation under section 652, subsection 1. The
service charge must be calculated according to the actual cost of providing municipal
services to the property and to the persons who use that property, and revenues derived
from the charge must be used to fund, to the extent possible, the costs of those services.
The amount calculated must be based on the last year for which complete records of the
services provided exist. The municipal legislative body shall identify those institutions and
organizations upon which a service charge is to be levied. A municipality that imposes a
service charge on an institution or organization must impose a service charge on every
similarly situated institution or organization. For the purposes of this section, "municipal
services" means all services provided by a municipality other than education and welfare.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §508, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2007, c. 627, §12, is amended to
read:
2. Limitation. The total annual service charges charge levied by a municipality on
any institution or organization under this section may not exceed 2% 20% of the gross
annual revenues of assessed value of the real estate held by the institution or organization
in the municipality. In order to qualify for this limitation, the institution or organization
must file with the municipality an audit of the revenues of the institution or organization
for the year immediately prior to the year in which the service charge is levied. The
municipal officers shall abate the portion of the service charge that exceeds 2% 20% of the
gross annual revenues of assessed value of the real estate held by the institution or
organization in the municipality.
Sec. 3. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 1, 2027.